Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2940YC (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 524.901, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. A state bank may invest without 3 limitation for its own account in federal tax credits 4 authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Â§45 and 26 U.S.C. Â§48. 5